Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1418XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1418XD (6) 91
ss/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 47.7, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. a. On or before January 1, 2006, the The state registrar
of voters shall implement in a uniform and nondiscriminatory
manner, a single, uniform, official, centralized, interactive
computerized statewide voter registration file defined,
maintained, and administered at the state level that contains
the name and registration information of every legally
registered voter in the state and assigns a unique identifier
to each legally registered voter in the state. The state voter
registration system shall be coordinated with other agency
databases within the state, including, but not limited to,
state department of transportation driver’s license records,
judicial records of convicted felons and persons declared
incompetent to vote, and department of health and human
services records of deceased persons.
b. On or after January 1, 2007, a A county shall not
establish or maintain a voter registration system separate
from the state voter registration system. Each county shall
provide to the state registrar the names, voter registration
information, and voting history of each registered voter in the
county in the form required by the state registrar.
c. A state or local election official may obtain immediate
electronic access to the information contained in the
computerized voter registration file. All voter registration
information obtained by a local election official shall be
electronically entered into the computerized voter registration
file on an expedited basis at the time the information is
provided to the local election official. The state registrar
shall provide such support as may be required to enable local
election officials to electronically enter the information into
the computerized voter registration file on an expedited basis.
The list generated from the computerized file shall serve as
the official voter registration list for the conduct of all
elections for federal office in the state.
LSB 1418XD (6) 91
-1- ss/ns 1/7

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
d. The state registrar shall prescribe by rule the
procedures for access to the state voter registration file,
including all of the following:
(1) Access protocols for adding, changing, or deleting
information from the state voter registration file.
(2) Training requirements for all state voter registration
file users.
(3) Technology safeguards, including county information
technology network requirements, necessary to access the state
voter registration file.
(4) Breach incident response requirements and protocols on
all matters related to elections.
e. The state registrar may rescind access to the statewide
voter registration file from a user who is not in compliance
with the prescribed rules.
f. (1) The state registrar shall, in the first quarter
of each calendar year, conduct a verification of all voters
in the statewide voter registration file, which shall
include cross-referencing the records in the statewide voter
registration file with similar records maintained by other
states. The state registrar of voters shall cancel the
registration of a voter found to be ineligible pursuant to
section 48A.30. The state registrar shall submit a report
to the general assembly by April 30 of each year regarding
the number of voter registrations canceled pursuant to this
paragraph. The state registrar shall also publish this report
on the internet site of the state registrar.
(2) g. The state registrar may contract with a third-party
vendor, including state and federal government agencies and
private entities, to develop or provide a program to allow
the state registrar to verify the status of records in the
statewide voter registration file and identify ineligible
voters on an ongoing basis.
h. The state registrar may adopt rules pursuant to chapter
17A for the use of federal and other state agency sources of
LSB 1418XD (6) 91
-2- ss/ns 2/7

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
information. The state registrar and county commissioners
of elections may use those sources of information for voter
registration file maintenance.
i. The department of transportation shall transmit to the
state registrar a list of each person seventeen years of age or
older in the state who has submitted documentation indicating
that the person is not a citizen of the United States.
Sec. 2. Section 48A.10A, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2025, are
amended to read as follows:
1. The state registrar shall compare lists of persons who
are registered to vote with the department of transportation’s
driver’s license and files, nonoperator’s identification
card files, and noncitizen identification files, and shall,
on an initial basis, issue a voter identification card to
each active, registered voter whose name does not appear
in the department of transportation’s files. The voter
identification card shall include the name of the registered
voter, a signature line above which the registered voter shall
sign the voter identification card, the registered voter’s
identification number assigned to the voter pursuant to
section 47.7, subsection 2, an additional four-digit personal
identification number assigned by the state commissioner, and
the times during which polling places will be open on election
days.
2. The commissioner shall issue voter identification cards
on an ongoing basis as prescribed by the state registrar. The
commissioner shall, as a part of the voter acknowledgment
process required under sections 48A.26 and 48A.26A, issue
a voter identification card to a registered voter under
this subsection at the time of registration or update to
registration if the registered voter’s name does not appear
in the department of transportation’s driver’s license, or
nonoperator’s identification card, or noncitizen identification
files. A registered voter whose name appears in the department
of transportation’s driver’s license, or nonoperator’s
LSB 1418XD (6) 91
-3- ss/ns 3/7

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
identification card, or noncitizen identification files shall
not be issued a voter identification card pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 3. Section 48A.25A, Code 2025, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
NEW SUBSECTION. 2A. A voter registration record shall be
designated as unconfirmed status if the registrant self-reports
to be a noncitizen on the voter registration form and signs
the portion of the form affirming the person’s United States
citizenship.
Sec. 4. Section 48A.30, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
by adding the following new paragraph:
NEW PARAGRAPH. h. The registered voter submits
documentation that indicates that the registered voter is not a
citizen of the United States or reports to a state or federal
agency that the registered voter is not a citizen of the United
States.
Sec. 5. Section 48A.30, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. When a registration is canceled pursuant to subsection 1,
paragraph “d”, “e”, or “g”, or “h”, the commissioner shall send
a notice of the cancellation to the registered voter.
Sec. 6. Section 48A.37, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. Electronic records shall include a status code
designating whether the records are active, inactive,
incomplete, pending, unconfirmed, or canceled.
a. Inactive records are records of registered voters to
whom notices have been sent pursuant to section 48A.28, and
who have not returned the card or otherwise responded to
the notice, and those records have been designated inactive
pursuant to section 48A.29. Inactive records are also records
of registered voters to whom notices have been sent pursuant
to section 48A.26A and who have not responded to the notice.
Incomplete records are records missing required information
LSB 1418XD (6) 91
-4- ss/ns 4/7

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
pursuant to section 48A.11, subsection 8. Pending records
are records of applicants whose applications have not been
verified pursuant to section 48A.25A. Unconfirmed records are
records of registered voters about whom the state registrar or
county commissioner has received information from a reliable
source indicating that the registered voter is not qualified.
Canceled records are records that have been canceled pursuant
to section 48A.30. All other records are active records.
b. An inactive record shall be made active when the
registered voter requests an absentee ballot, votes at an
election, registers again, or reports a change of name,
address, telephone number, or political party or organization
affiliation. An incomplete record shall be made active when
a completed application is received from the applicant and
verified pursuant to section 48A.25A. A pending record shall
be made active upon verification or upon the voter providing
identification pursuant to section 48A.8. An unconfirmed
record shall be made active upon the registered voter providing
evidence that the registered voter is qualified.
Sec. 7. Section 49.77, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2025,
is amended to read as follows:
a. Any person desiring to vote shall sign a voter’s
declaration provided by the officials, in substantially the
following form:
VOTER’S DECLARATION
OF ELIGIBILITY
I do solemnly swear or affirm that I am a resident of the ....
precinct, .... ward or township, city of ........, county of
........, Iowa. I am a citizen of the United States.
I am a registered voter. I was born on the .... day of ....
(month) .... (year). I have not voted and will not
vote in any other precinct in said election.
I understand that any false statement in this declaration is
a criminal offense punishable as provided by law.
................................
LSB 1418XD (6) 91
-5- ss/ns 5/7

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Signature of Voter
................................
Address
................................
Telephone (optional)
Approved:
............................................
Board Member
Sec. 8. Section 49.80, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2025,
is amended by adding the following new subparagraph:
NEW SUBPARAGRAPH. (5) The person’s citizenship status.
Sec. 9. Section 50.22, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
2. The decision to count or reject each ballot shall be
made upon the basis of the information given on the envelope
containing the provisional ballot, the evidence concerning
the challenge, the registration and the returned receipts of
registration. Ballots submitted to the board pursuant to
section 49.78 or 49.81 that are not cured by the deadline
provided in section 49.81, subsection 6, shall be rejected.